test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-h40_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - : # h_
    offur+N+Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef: offur
    offur+N+Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef: offur
    offur+N+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef: ofri
    offur+N+Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef: offurs
    offur+N+Neu+Pl+Nom+Indef: offur
    offur+N+Neu+Pl+Acc+Indef: offur
    offur+N+Neu+Pl+Dat+Indef: ofrum
    offur+N+Neu+Pl+Gen+Indef: ofra
    offur+N+Neu+Sg+Nom+Def: ofrið
    offur+N+Neu+Sg+Acc+Def: ofrið
    offur+N+Neu+Sg+Dat+Def: ofrinum
    offur+N+Neu+Sg+Gen+Def: offursins
    offur+N+Neu+Pl+Nom+Def: ofrini
    offur+N+Neu+Pl+Acc+Def: ofrini
    offur+N+Neu+Pl+Dat+Def: ofrunum
    offur+N+Neu+Pl+Gen+Def: ofranna
